Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-525
Hearing; decree; district established.

Upon the hearing, if it shall appear that a petition for the organization of a reclamation district has been signed and presented, as provided in section 46-516, in conformity with the Reclamation Act, and that the allegations of the petition are true, and that no protesting petition has been filed, or if filed has been dismissed as provided in section 46-521, the Chief Water Officer shall, by order duly entered of record, adjudicate all questions of jurisdiction, declare the district organized, and give it a corporate name, by which it shall thereafter be known in all proceedings. Thereupon the district shall be a political subdivision of the State of Nebraska and a body corporate with all the powers of a public or municipal corporation.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 7(7), p. 530;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 160.